Mississippi, session 2026, HB607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-125-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-125-19.  (1)  To carry out the intention of the Legislature to provide safe and sanitary facilities and healthful programs, the licensing agency shall adopt and publish rules to implement the provisions of this chapter, which shall include reasonable and fair standards.  Any conflict between these standards and those that may be set forth in local, county or city ordinances shall be resolved in favor of those having statewide effect.  Those standards shall relate to: (a)  The assurance that PPEC services are family centered and provide individualized medical, developmental and family training services. (b)  The maintenance of PPEC centers, based upon the size of the structure and number of children, relating to plumbing, heating, lighting, ventilation and other building conditions, including adequate space, which will ensure the health, safety, comfort and protection from fire of the children served. (c)  The appropriate provisions of the most recent edition of the "Life Safety Code" shall be applied. (d)  The number and qualifications of all personnel who have responsibility for the care of the children served. (e)  All sanitary conditions within the PPEC center and its surroundings, including water supply, sewage disposal, food handling and general hygiene, and maintenance thereof, which will ensure the health and comfort of children served. (f)  Programs and basic services promoting and maintaining the health and development of the children served and meeting the training needs of the children's parents or legal guardians. (g)  Supportive, contracted, other operational and transportation services.  However, the licensing agency may not require physical therapists to have prior work experience in order to work at a PPEC center. (h)  Maintenance of appropriate medical records, data and information relative to the children and programs.  Those records shall be maintained in the facility for inspection by the agency. (2)  The licensing agency shall adopt rules to ensure that: (a)  No child attends a PPEC center for more than twelve (12) hours within a twenty-four-hour period. (b)  No PPEC center provides services other than those provided to medically or technologically dependent children. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.